Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.82.030

Advancing money or property to be used for extortionate credit.

A person who advances money or property, whether as a gift, loan, investment, or pursuant to a partnership or profit-sharing agreement or otherwise, to any person, with the knowledge that it is the intention of that person to use the money or property so advanced, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of making extortionate extensions of credit, is guilty of a class B felony.

[ 2001 c 222 s 5. Prior: 1985 c 455 s 4; 1984 c 270 s 3.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective date—2001 c 222: See notes following RCW 9A.82.001.